Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2024
Corporation; purpose.

(1) Every corporation incorporated under the Business Corporation Act
shall have the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited
purpose shall be set forth in the articles of incorporation.

(2) A corporation engaging in a business subject to regulation under
another law of this state may incorporate under the act only if permitted
by, and subject to all limitations of, such other law.

(3) Corporations shall not be organized under the act to perform any professional services as specified in section
21-2202 except for professional services rendered
by a designated broker as defined in section 81-885.01.

(4) A designated broker as defined in section 81-885.01 may be organized
as a corporation under the Business Corporation Act.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 24;

Laws 2011, LB315, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB852, § 1.
July 19, 2012